District of Columbia statutes.
8-438

Pesticide registration fee.

The Department shall set a pesticide registration fee of at least $200.

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 9, 59 DCR 10166
Section 14(a) of D.C. Law 19-191 provided that §§ 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, and 13 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
This section is referenced in § 8-438.01.